Utah statutes.
26-21-206.   Covered providers and covered contractors required to apply for clearance of certain individuals.

(1)  As provided in Subsection (2), each covered provider and covered contractor operating in this state shall:

(a)  collect from each covered individual it engages, and each individual it intends to engage as a covered individual, the personal identification information specified by the department under Subsection 26-21-204(4)(b); and

(b)  submit to the department an application for clearance for the individual, including:

(i)  the personal identification information; and

(ii)  any fees established by the department under Subsection 26-21-204(9).

(2)  Clearance granted for an individual pursuant to an application submitted by a covered provider or a covered contractor is valid until the later of:

(a)  two years after the individual is no longer engaged as a covered individual; or

(b)  the covered provider's or covered contractor's next license renewal date.



Enacted by Chapter 328, 2012 General Session

